California statutes. Probate Code
  CHAPTER 3. Transitional Provisions [4665. - 4665.]

4665.

Except as otherwise provided by statute:

(a) On and after July 1, 2000, this division applies to all advance health care directives, including, but not limited to, durable powers of attorney for health care and declarations under the Natural Death Act (former Chapter 3.9 (commencing with Section 7185) of Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code), regardless of whether they were given or executed before, on, or after July 1, 2000.

(b) This division applies to all proceedings concerning advance health care directives commenced on or after July 1, 2000.

(c) This division applies to all proceedings concerning written advance health care directives commenced before July 1, 2000, unless the court determines that application of a particular provision of this division would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the proceedings or the rights of the parties and other interested persons, in which case the particular provision of this division does not apply and prior law applies.

(d) Nothing in this division affects the validity of an advance health care directive executed before July 1, 2000, that was valid under prior law.

(e) Nothing in this division affects the validity of a durable power of attorney for health care executed on a printed form that was valid under prior law, regardless of whether execution occurred before, on, or after July 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. UNIFORM HEALTH CARE DECISIONS ACT [4670. - 4743.]



  CHAPTER 1. Advance Health Care Directives [4670. - 4698.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4670. - 4679.]

4670.

An adult having capacity may give an individual health care instruction. The individual instruction may be oral or written. The individual instruction may be limited to take effect only if a specified condition arises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4671.

(a) An adult having capacity may execute a power of attorney for health care, as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4680). The power of attorney for health care may authorize the agent to make health care decisions and may also include individual health care instructions.

(b) The principal in a power of attorney for health care may grant authority to make decisions relating to the personal care of the principal, including, but not limited to, determining where the principal will live, providing meals, hiring household employees, providing transportation, handling mail, and arranging recreation and entertainment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4672.

(a) A written advance health care directive may include the individual’s nomination of a conservator of the person or estate or both, or a guardian of the person or estate or both, for consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the individual’s person or estate are thereafter commenced.

(b) If the protective proceedings are conservatorship proceedings in this state, the nomination has the effect provided in Section 1810 and the court shall give effect to the most recent writing executed in accordance with Section 1810, whether or not the writing is a written advance health care directive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4673.

(a) A written advance health care directive is legally sufficient if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

 (1) The advance directive contains the date of its execution.

 (2) The advance directive is signed either by the patient or in the patient’s name by another adult in the patient’s presence and at the patient’s direction.

 (3) The advance directive is either acknowledged before a notary public or signed by at least two witnesses who satisfy the requirements of Sections 4674 and 4675.

(b) An electronic advance health care directive or power of attorney for health care is legally sufficient if the requirements in subdivision (a) are satisfied, except that for the purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), an acknowledgment before a notary public shall be required, and if a digital signature is used, it meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The digital signature either meets the requirements of Section 16.5 of the Government Code and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 7 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations or the digital signature uses an algorithm approved by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(2) The digital signature is unique to the person using it.

(3) The digital signature is capable of verification.

(4) The digital signature is under the sole control of the person using it.

(5) The digital signature is linked to data in such a manner that if the data are changed, the digital signature is invalidated.

(6) The digital signature persists with the document and not by association in separate files.

(7) The digital signature is bound to a digital certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4674.

If the written advance health care directive is signed by witnesses, as provided in Section 4673, the following requirements shall be satisfied:

(a) The witnesses shall be adults.

(b) Each witness signing the advance directive shall witness either the signing of the advance directive by the patient or the patient’s acknowledgment of the signature or the advance directive.

(c) None of the following persons may act as a witness:

(1) The patient’s health care provider or an employee of the patient’s health care provider.

(2) The operator or an employee of a community care facility.

(3) The operator or an employee of a residential care facility for the elderly.

(4) The agent, where the advance directive is a power of attorney for health care.

(d) Each witness shall make the following declaration in substance:

“I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of California (1) that the individual who signed or acknowledged this advance health care directive is personally known to me, or that the individual’s identity was proven to me by convincing evidence, (2) that the individual signed or acknowledged this advance directive in my presence, (3) that the individual appears to be of sound mind and under no duress, fraud, or undue influence, (4) that I am not a person appointed as agent by this advance directive, and (5) that I am not the individual’s health care provider, an employee of the individual’s health care provider, the operator of a community care facility, an employee of an operator of a community care facility, the operator of a residential care facility for the elderly, nor an employee of an operator of a residential care facility for the elderly.”

(e) At least one of the witnesses shall be an individual who is neither related to the patient by blood, marriage, or adoption, nor entitled to any portion of the patient’s estate upon the patient’s death under a will existing when the advance directive is executed or by operation of law then existing.

(f) The witness satisfying the requirement of subdivision (e) shall also sign the following declaration in substance:

“I further declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of California that I am not related to the individual executing this advance health care directive by blood, marriage, or adoption, and, to the best of my knowledge, I am not entitled to any part of the individual’s estate upon his or her death under a will now existing or by operation of law.”

(g) The provisions of this section applicable to witnesses do not apply to a notary public before whom an advance health care directive is acknowledged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4675.

(a) If an individual is a patient in a skilled nursing facility when a written advance health care directive is executed, the advance directive is not effective unless a patient advocate or ombudsman, as may be designated by the Department of Aging for this purpose pursuant to any other applicable provision of law, signs the advance directive as a witness, either as one of two witnesses or in addition to notarization. The patient advocate or ombudsman shall declare that he or she is serving as a witness as required by this subdivision. It is the intent of this subdivision to recognize that some patients in skilled nursing facilities are insulated from a voluntary decisionmaking role, by virtue of the custodial nature of their care, so as to require special assurance that they are capable of willfully and voluntarily executing an advance directive.

(b) A witness who is a patient advocate or ombudsman may rely on the representations of the administrators or staff of the skilled nursing facility, or of family members, as convincing evidence of the identity of the patient if the patient advocate or ombudsman believes that the representations provide a reasonable basis for determining the identity of the patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4676.

(a) A written advance health care directive or similar instrument executed in another state or jurisdiction in compliance with the laws of that state or jurisdiction or of this state, is valid and enforceable in this state to the same extent as a written advance directive validly executed in this state.

(b) In the absence of knowledge to the contrary, a physician or other health care provider may presume that a written advance health care directive or similar instrument, whether executed in another state or jurisdiction or in this state, is valid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4677.

A health care provider, health care service plan, health care institution, disability insurer, self-insured employee welfare plan, or nonprofit hospital plan or a similar insurance plan may not require or prohibit the execution or revocation of an advance health care directive as a condition for providing health care, admission to a facility, or furnishing insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4678.

Unless otherwise specified in an advance health care directive, a person then authorized to make health care decisions for a patient has the same rights as the patient to request, receive, examine, copy, and consent to the disclosure of medical or any other health care information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4679.

(a) (1) This chapter does not prohibit the execution of a voluntary standalone
 psychiatric advance directive.

(2) As used in this chapter, “psychiatric advance directive” means a legal document, executed on a voluntary basis by a person who has the capacity to make medical decisions and in accordance with the requirements for an advance health care directive in this division, that allows a person with mental illness to protect their autonomy and ability to direct their own care by documenting their preferences for treatment in advance of a mental health crisis.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to promote the use of a psychiatric advance directive, subject to the requirements of this division, by a person who wants to make sure their health care providers know their treatment preferences in the event of a future mental health
 crisis.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Research has demonstrated that the use of psychiatric advance directives improves collaboration, which improves outcomes, increases empowerment, and improves medication adherence.

(2) A psychiatric advance directive is most helpful when it includes reasons for preferring or opposing specific types of treatment.

(3) Mental health preferences that do not constitute health care instructions or decisions as defined in this part may provide valuable information to improve an individual’s mental health care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 171, Sec. 2.   (AB 1029)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers of Attorney for Health Care [4680. - 4691.]

4680.

A power of attorney for health care is legally sufficient if it satisfies the requirements of Section 4673.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4681.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the principal may limit the application of any provision of this division by an express statement in the power of attorney for health care or by providing an inconsistent rule in the power of attorney.

(b) A power of attorney for health care may not limit either the application of a statute specifically providing that it is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney or a statute concerning any of the following:

(1) Statements required to be included in a power of attorney.

(2) Operative dates of statutory enactments or amendments.

(3) Formalities for execution of a power of attorney for health care.

(4) Qualifications of witnesses.

(5) Qualifications of agents.

(6) Protection of third persons from liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4682.

Unless otherwise provided in a power of attorney for health care, the authority of an agent becomes effective only on a determination that the principal lacks capacity, and ceases to be effective on a determination that the principal has recovered capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4683.

Subject to any limitations in the power of attorney for health care:

(a) An agent designated in the power of attorney may make health care decisions for the principal to the same extent the principal could make health care decisions if the principal had the capacity to do so.

(b) The agent may also make decisions that may be effective after the principal’s death, including the following:

(1) Making a disposition under the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 7150) of Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) Authorizing an autopsy under Section 7113 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Directing the disposition of remains under Section 7100 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Authorizing the release of the records of the principal to the extent necessary for the agent to fulfill his or her duties as set forth in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.

An agent shall make a health care decision in accordance with the principal’s individual health care instructions, if any, and other wishes to the extent known to the agent. Otherwise, the agent shall make the decision in accordance with the agent’s determination of the principal’s best interest. In determining the principal’s best interest, the agent shall consider the principal’s personal values to the extent known to the agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4685.

Unless the power of attorney for health care provides otherwise, the agent designated in the power of attorney who is known to the health care provider to be reasonably available and willing to make health care decisions has priority over any other person in making health care decisions for the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4686.

Unless the power of attorney for health care provides a time of termination, the authority of the agent is exercisable notwithstanding any lapse of time since execution of the power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4687.

Nothing in this division affects any right the person designated as an agent under a power of attorney for health care may have, apart from the power of attorney, to make or participate in making health care decisions for the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4688.

Where this division does not provide a rule governing agents under powers of attorney, the law of agency applies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4689.

Nothing in this division authorizes an agent under a power of attorney for health care to make a health care decision if the principal objects to the decision. If the principal objects to the health care decision of the agent under a power of attorney, the matter shall be governed by the law that would apply if there were no power of attorney for health care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4690.

(a) If the principal becomes wholly or partially incapacitated, or if there is a question concerning the capacity of the principal, the agent may consult with a person previously designated by the principal for this purpose, and may also consult with and obtain information needed to carry out the agent’s duties from the principal’s spouse, physician, supervising health care provider, attorney, a member of the principal’s family, or other person, including a business entity or government agency, with respect to matters covered by the power of attorney for health care.

(b) A person described in subdivision (a) from whom information is requested shall disclose information that the agent requires to carry out his or her duties. Disclosure under this section is not a waiver of any privilege that may apply to the information disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 196.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4691.

If directed by the principal in a power of attorney for health care, an attorney-in-fact shall, upon the death of the principal, inform those individuals whose names are provided by the principal to the attorney-in-fact for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 92, Sec. 4.   (AB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Revocation of Advance Directives [4695. - 4698.]

4695.

(a) A patient having capacity may revoke the designation of an agent only by a signed writing or by personally informing the supervising health care provider.

(b) A patient having capacity may revoke all or part of an advance health care directive, other than the designation of an agent, at any time and in any manner that communicates an intent to revoke.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4696.

A health care provider, agent, conservator, or surrogate who is informed of a revocation of an advance health care directive shall promptly communicate the fact of the revocation to the supervising health care provider and to any health care institution where the patient is receiving care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4697.

(a) If after executing a power of attorney for health care the principal’s marriage to the agent is dissolved or annulled, the principal’s designation of the former spouse as an agent to make health care decisions for the principal is revoked.

(b) If the agent’s authority is revoked solely by subdivision (a), it is revived by the principal’s remarriage to the agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4698.

An advance health care directive that conflicts with an earlier advance directive revokes the earlier advance directive to the extent of the conflict.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Advance Health Care Directive Forms [4700. - 4701.]

4700.

The form provided in Section 4701 may, but need not, be used to create an advance health care directive. The other sections of this division govern the effect of the form or any other writing used to create an advance health care directive. An individual may complete or modify all or any part of the form in Section 4701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4701.

The statutory advance health care directive form is as follows:

ADVANCE HEALTH CARE DIRECTIVE
(California Probate Code Section 4701)
Explanation

You have the right to give instructions about your own physical and mental health care. You also have the right to name someone else to make those health care decisions for you. This form lets you do either or both of these things. It also lets you express your wishes regarding donation of organs and the designation of your primary physician. If you use this form, you may complete or modify all or any part of it. You are free to use a different form.

Part 1 of
 this form is a power of attorney for health care. Part 1 lets you name another individual as agent to make health care decisions for you if you become incapable of making your own decisions or if you want someone else to make those decisions for you now even though you are still capable. You may also name an alternate agent to act for you if your first choice is not willing, able, or reasonably available to make decisions for you. (Your agent may not be an operator or employee of a community care facility or a residential care facility where you are receiving care, or your supervising health care provider or employee of the health care institution where you are receiving care, unless your agent is related to you or is a coworker.)

Unless the form you sign limits the authority of your agent, your agent may make all health care decisions for you. This form has a
 place for you to limit the authority of your agent. You need not limit the authority of your agent if you wish to rely on your agent for all health care decisions that may have to be made. If you choose not to limit the authority of your agent, your agent will have the right to:

(a) Consent or refuse consent to any care, treatment, service, or procedure to maintain, diagnose, or otherwise affect a physical or mental condition.

(b) Select or discharge health care providers and institutions.

(c) For all physical and mental health care, approve or disapprove diagnostic tests, surgical procedures, and programs of medication.

(d) Direct the provision, withholding,
 or withdrawal of artificial nutrition and hydration and all other forms of health care, including cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(e) Donate your organs, tissues, and parts, authorize an autopsy, and direct disposition of remains.

However, your agent will not be able to commit you to a mental health facility, or consent to convulsive treatment, psychosurgery, sterilization, or abortion for you.

Part 2 of this form lets you give specific instructions about any aspect of your health care, whether or not you appoint an agent. Choices are provided for you to express your wishes regarding the provision, withholding, or withdrawal of treatment to keep you alive, as well as the provision of pain relief. Space is also provided for you to add to the choices you have
 made or for you to write out any additional wishes. If you are satisfied to allow your agent to determine what is best for you in making end-of-life decisions, you need not fill out Part 2 of this form.

Part 3 of this form lets you express an intention to donate your bodily organs, tissues, and parts following your death.

Part 4 of this form lets you designate a physician to have primary responsibility for your health care.

After completing this form, sign and date the form at the end. The form shall be signed by two qualified witnesses or acknowledged before a notary public. Give a copy of the signed and completed form to your physician, to any other health care providers you may have, to any health care institution at which you are receiving care, and to any health care
 agents you have named. You should talk to the person you have named as agent to make sure that they understand your wishes and is willing to take the responsibility.

You have the right to revoke this advance health care directive or replace this form at any time.* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *PART 1
 POWER OF ATTORNEY FOR HEALTH CARE(1.1) DESIGNATION OF AGENT: I designate the following individual as my agent to make health care
 decisions for me:
(name of individual you choose as agent)
(address)(city) (state)(ZIP Code)
(home phone)(work
 phone)
OPTIONAL: If I revoke my agent’s authority or if my agent is not willing, able, or reasonably available to make a health care decision for me, I designate as my first alternate agent:
(name of individual you choose as first alternate agent)
(address)(city) (state)(ZIP Code)
(home phone)(work phone)
OPTIONAL: If I revoke the authority of my agent and first alternate agent or if neither is willing, able, or reasonably available to make a health care decision for me, I designate as my second alternate agent:
(name of individual you choose as second alternate
 agent)
(address)(city) (state)(ZIP Code)
(home phone)(work phone)
(1.2) AGENT’S AUTHORITY: My agent is authorized to make all physical and mental health care decisions for me, including decisions to provide, withhold, or withdraw artificial nutrition and hydration and all other forms of health care to keep me alive, except as I state here:

(Add additional
 sheets if needed.)
(1.3) WHEN AGENT’S AUTHORITY BECOMES EFFECTIVE: My agent’s authority becomes effective when my primary physician determines that I am unable to make my own health care decisions unless I mark the following box. If I mark this box ◻, my agent’s authority to make health care decisions for me takes effect immediately.(1.4) AGENT’S OBLIGATION: My agent shall make health care decisions for me in accordance with this power of attorney for health care, any instructions I give in Part 2 of this form, and my other wishes to the extent known to my agent. To the extent my wishes
 are unknown, my agent shall make health care decisions for me in accordance with what my agent determines to be in my best interest. In determining my best interest, my agent shall consider my personal values to the extent known to my agent.(1.5) AGENT’S POSTDEATH AUTHORITY: My agent is authorized to donate my organs, tissues, and parts, authorize an autopsy, and direct disposition of my remains, except as I state here or in Part 3 of this form:

(Add additional sheets if needed.)(1.6) NOMINATION OF CONSERVATOR: If a conservator of my person needs to be appointed for me by a court, I nominate the agent designated in this form. If that agent is not willing, able, or reasonably available to act as conservator, I nominate the alternate agents whom I have named, in the order designated.PART 2
 INSTRUCTIONS FOR HEALTH CAREIf you fill out this part of the form, you may
 strike any wording you do not want.(2.1) END–OF–LIFE DECISIONS: I direct that my health care providers and others involved in my care provide, withhold, or withdraw treatment in accordance with the choice I have marked below:◻(a) Choice Not To Prolong LifeI do not want my life to be prolonged if (1) I have an incurable and irreversible condition that will result in my death within a relatively short time, (2) I become unconscious and, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, I will not
 regain consciousness, or (3) the likely risks and burdens of treatment would outweigh the expected benefits, OR◻(b) Choice To Prolong LifeI want my life to be prolonged as long as possible within the limits of generally accepted health care standards.(2.2) RELIEF FROM PAIN: Except as I state in the following space, I direct that treatment for alleviation of pain or discomfort be provided at all times, even if it hastens my death:

(Add additional sheets if needed.) WISHES FOR PHYSICAL AND MENTAL HEALTH CARE: (If you do not agree with any of the optional choices above and wish to write your own, or if you wish to add to the instructions you have given above, you may do so here.) I direct that:

(Add additional sheets if needed.)PART 3
 DONATION OF ORGANS, TISSUES, AND PARTS AT DEATH
(OPTIONAL)(3.1) ◻ Upon my death, I give my organs, tissues, and parts (mark box to indicate yes). By checking the box above, and notwithstanding my choice in Part 2 of this form, I authorize my agent to consent to any temporary medical procedure necessary solely to evaluate and/or maintain my organs, tissues, and/or parts for purposes of donation.My donation is for the following purposes (strike any of the following you do not want):
(a) Transplant
(b) Therapy
(c) Research
(d) EducationIf you want to restrict your donation of an organ, tissue, or part in some way, please state your restriction on the following lines: 
If I leave this part
 blank, it is not a refusal to make a donation. My state-authorized donor registration should be followed, or, if none, my agent may make a donation upon my death. If no agent is named above, I acknowledge that California law permits an authorized individual to make such a decision on my behalf. (To state any limitation, preference, or instruction regarding donation, please use the lines above or in Section 1.5 of this form).PART 4
 PRIMARY PHYSICIAN
(OPTIONAL)(4.1) I designate the following physician as my primary physician:
(name of physician)
(address)(city) (state)(ZIP Code)
(phone)
OPTIONAL: If the physician I have designated above is not willing, able, or
 reasonably available to act as my primary physician, I designate the following physician as my primary physician:(name of physician)
(address)(city) (state)(ZIP Code)
(phone)
* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *
 PART 5(5.1) EFFECT OF COPY: A copy of this form has the same effect as the original.(5.2) SIGNATURE: Sign and date the form here:(date)(sign your name)(address)(print your name)(city)(state)
(5.3) STATEMENT OF WITNESSES: I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of California (1) that the individual who signed or acknowledged this advance health care directive is personally known to me, or that the individual’s identity was proven to me by convincing evidence, (2) that the individual signed or acknowledged this advance directive in my presence, (3) that the individual appears to be of sound mind and under no duress, fraud, or undue influence, (4) that I am not a person appointed as agent by this advance directive, and (5) that I am not the
 individual’s health care provider, an employee of the individual’s health care provider, the operator of a community care facility, an employee of an operator of a community care facility, the operator of a residential care facility for the elderly, nor an employee of an operator of a residential care facility for the elderly.First witnessSecond witness

(print name)(print name)

(address)(address)

(city)(state)(city)(state)

(signature of witness)(signature of witness)

(date)(date)(5.4) ADDITIONAL STATEMENT OF WITNESSES: At least one of the above witnesses must also sign the following declaration:

I further declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of California that I am not related to the individual executing this advance health care directive by blood, marriage, or adoption, and, to the best of my knowledge, I am
 not entitled to any part of the individual’s estate upon their death under a will now existing or by operation of law.

(signature of witness)(signature of witness)PART 6
 SPECIAL WITNESS REQUIREMENT(6.1) The following statement is required only if you are a patient in a skilled nursing facility—a health care facility that provides the following basic services: skilled nursing care and supportive care to patients whose primary need is for availability of skilled nursing care on an extended basis. The patient advocate or ombudsman must sign the following statement:STATEMENT OF PATIENT ADVOCATE OR OMBUDSMANI declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of California that I am a patient advocate or ombudsman as designated by the State Department of Aging and that I am
 serving as a witness as required by Section 4675 of the Probate Code.

(date)(sign your name)

(address)(print your name)
(city)(state)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 171, Sec. 3.   (AB 1029)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Health Care Surrogates [4711. - 4717.]

4711.

(a) A patient may designate an adult as a surrogate to make health care decisions by personally informing the supervising health care provider or a designee of the health care facility caring for the patient. The designation of a surrogate shall be promptly recorded in the patient’s health care record.

(b) Unless the patient specifies a shorter period, a surrogate designation under subdivision (a) is effective only during the course of treatment or illness or during the stay in the health care institution when the surrogate
 designation is made, or for 60 days, whichever period is shorter.

(c) The expiration of a surrogate designation under subdivision (b) does not affect any role the person designated under subdivision (a) may have in making health care decisions for the patient under any other law or standards of practice.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 4685, if the patient has designated an agent under a power of attorney for health care, the surrogate designated under subdivision (a) has priority over the agent for the period provided in subdivision (b), but the designation of a surrogate does not revoke the designation of an agent unless the patient communicates the intention to revoke in compliance with
 subdivision (a) of Section 4695.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 782, Sec. 1.   (AB 2338)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4712.

(a) If a patient lacks the capacity to make a health care decision, the following legally recognized health care decisionmakers may make health care decisions on the patient’s behalf, in the following descending order of priority:

(1) The patient’s surrogate selected pursuant to Section 4711.

(2) The patient’s agent pursuant to an advance health care directive or a power of attorney for health care.

(3) The conservator or guardian of the patient having the authority to make health care decisions for the patient.

(b) Except as set forth in Section 4715, if a patient lacks the capacity to make a health care decision, but does not have a legally recognized health care decisionmaker pursuant to subdivision (a), a health care provider or a designee of the health care facility caring for the patient may choose a surrogate to make health care decisions on the patient’s behalf, as appropriate in the given situation. The patient’s surrogate shall be an adult who has demonstrated special care and concern for the patient, is familiar with the patient’s personal values and beliefs
 to the extent known, and is reasonably available and willing to serve. A surrogate may be chosen from any of the following persons:

(1) The spouse or domestic partner of the patient.

(2) An adult child of the patient.

(3) A parent of the
 patient.

(4) An adult sibling of the patient.

(5) An adult grandchild of the patient.

(6) An adult
 relative or close personal friend.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.   (AB 2338)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4714.

A surrogate, including a person acting as a surrogate, shall make a health care decision in accordance with the patient’s individual health care instructions, if any, and other wishes to the extent known to the surrogate. Otherwise, the surrogate shall make the decision in accordance with the surrogate’s determination of the patient’s best interest. In determining the patient’s best interest, the surrogate shall consider the patient’s personal values to the extent known to the surrogate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4715.

A patient having capacity at any time may disqualify another person, including a member of the patient’s family, from acting as the patient’s surrogate by a signed writing or by personally informing the supervising health care provider of the disqualification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4716.

(a) If a patient lacks the capacity to make a health care decision, the patient’s domestic partner shall have the same authority as a spouse has to make a health care decision for his or her incapacitated spouse. This section may not be construed to expand or restrict the ability of a spouse to make a health care decision for an incapacitated spouse.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Capacity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4609.

(2) “Health care” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4615.

(3) “Health care decision” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4617.

(4) “Domestic partner” has the same meaning as that term is used in Section 297 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4717.
